Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.109.080

Scholarship recipients—Service obligation.

Each Washington international exchange scholarship recipient shall agree to complete the service obligation as defined by the office.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 202; 1996 c 253 s 408.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—Purpose—Severability—Part headings not law—1996 c 253: See notes following RCW 28B.109.010.